District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-302.07

Determination of controlling child-support order.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 207, 42 DCR 6748
July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(c), 45 DCR 2924
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(3)(B), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
This section is referenced in § 46-306.11.
1981 Ed., § 30-342.7.
D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote the section.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2785).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 207 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).